District of Columbia statutes.
21-114

Bond from parents of child entitled to property.

When an infant whose father or mother is living becomes entitled to property, the Probate Court may require the father or mother, as guardian, to give bond and security to account for the property, and on his or her failure or refusal so to do may appoint another person guardian, who shall give bond as in other cases.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 740, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Cross References

Undertaking in lieu of fiduciary bond, see § 16-601.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-114.
1973 Ed., § 21-114.